District of Columbia statutes.
2-309.01

Repealed

Creation of Contract Appeals Board.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 901, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(aa), 44 DCR 1423
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1702(a), 47 DCR 6308
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 1102, 57 DCR 6242
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
Short title: Section 1101 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle K of title I of the act may be cited as the “Contract Appeals Board Amendment Act of 2010”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1102 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1702(a) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1702(a) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
1981 Ed., § 1-1189.1.